Louisiana, session 2026, SB387.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1856.1(B)(2)(a), 1863, 1865(A), and the introductory paragraph
of 1865(G) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1867.1 and 1868.2 are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§1856.1. Pharmacy record audits; recoupment; appeals
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when an audit
of the records of a pharmacy is conducted by an entity, the audit shall be conducted
in accordance with the following criteria:
* * *
(2)(a) No entity shall conduct an audit at a particular pharmacy more than one
time annually. The audit shall be limited to claims submitted not more than
twelve months prior to date the audit begins. However, the provisions of this
Paragraph shall not apply when an entity must return to a pharmacy to complete an
audit already in progress, or there is an identified history of errors, an identified
Page 1 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
activity which a reasonable man person would believe to be inappropriate, or illegal
activity that the entity has brought to the attention of the pharmacy owner or
corporate headquarters of the pharmacy.
* * *
§1863. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Drug Shortage List" means a list of drug products posted on the United
States Food and Drug Administration drug shortage website.
(2) "Effective rate pricing" means any payment reduction for pharmacist or
pharmacy services by a pharmacy benefit manager under a reconciliation process for
direct or indirect remuneration fees, a brand or generic effective rate of
reimbursement, or any other reduction or aggregate reduction of payment.
(3) "Enrollee" means any individual entitled to coverage of healthcare
services under the terms of a health benefit plan.
(3)(4) "Health benefit plan", "health plan", "plan", "benefit", or "health
insurance coverage" means services consisting of medical care provided directly
through insurance, reimbursement, or other means, and including items and services
paid for as medical care under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate,
hospital or medical service plan contract, preferred provider organization contract,
or health maintenance organization contract offered by a health insurance issuer.
However, excepted benefits are not included as a "health benefit plan".
(5) "Healthcare service" means an item or service furnished to any
individual for the purpose of preventing, diagnosing, alleviating, curing, or
healing human illness, injury, or physical disability.
(4)(6) "Health insurance issuer" means any entity that offers health insurance
coverage through a plan, policy, or certificate of insurance subject to state law that
regulates the business of insurance. "Health insurance issuer" shall also include a
health maintenance organization, as defined and licensed pursuant to Subpart I of
Part I of Chapter 2 of this Code.
(5)(7) "Local pharmacy" means a pharmacy as defined in the North American
Page 2 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
Industry Classsification Classification System (NAICS) Code 456110, which is
domiciled in Louisiana and has fewer than ten retail outlets under its corporate
umbrella, or which is owned and operated by a nonprofit health system, or any
affiliated hospital, domiciled in Louisiana.
(6)(8) "Maximum Allowable Cost List" means a listing of the National Drug
Code used by a pharmacy benefit manager setting the maximum allowable cost on
which reimbursement to a pharmacy or pharmacist may be based. "Maximum
Allowable Cost List" shall include any term that a pharmacy benefit manager or a
healthcare insurer may use to establish reimbursement rates for generic and
multi-source brand drugs to a pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services.
(7)(9) "NDC" means the National Drug Code, a numerical identifier assigned
to all prescription drugs.
(10) "Person" includes a natural person, corporation, mutual company,
unincorporated association, partnership, joint venture, limited liability
company, trust, estate, foundation, not-for-profit corporation, unincorporated
organization, government or governmental subdivision, or agency.
(8)(11) "Pharmacist" means a licensed pharmacist as defined in R.S. 22:1852.
(9)(12) "Pharmacist services" means products, goods, or services provided
as a part of the practice of pharmacy as defined in R.S. 22:1852.
(10)(13) "Pharmacy" means any appropriately licensed place where
prescription drugs are dispensed as defined in R.S. 22:1852.
(14) "Pharmacy benefit management fee" means a fee that covers the
cost of providing one or more pharmacy benefit management services and that
does not exceed the value of the service or services actually performed by the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(15) "Pharmacy benefit management service" means any of the
following:
(a) Negotiating the price of prescription drugs, including negotiating and
contracting for direct or indirect rebates, discounts, or other price concessions.
(b) Managing any aspect of a prescription drug benefit including but not
Page 3 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
limited to the processing and payment of claims for prescription drugs, the
performance of drug utilization review, the processing of drug prior
authorization requests, the adjudication of appeals or grievances related to the
prescription drug benefit, contracting with network pharmacies, controlling the
cost of covered prescription drugs, managing or providing data relating to the
prescription drug benefit, or the provision of services related thereto.
(c) Performance of any administrative, managerial, clinical, pricing,
financial, reimbursement, data administration or reporting, or billing service.
(d) Such other services as the commissioner may define by rule or
regulation.
(11)(16) "Pharmacy benefit manager" or "PBM" has the same meaning as
the term defined in R.S. 22:1641 and includes any person, either directly or
indirectly, that provides one or more pharmacy benefit management services on
behalf of an insurer or health plan, and any agent, contractor, intermediary, affiliate,
subsidiary, or related entity of such person who facilitates, provides, directs, or
oversees the provision of the pharmacy benefit management services or entity, and
any subsidiary, parent, or affiliate of such entity that directly or indirectly
facilitates, provides, directs, manages, administers, or oversees the provision of
one or more pharmacy benefit management services. The administration or
management of a prescription benefits plan includes direct or indirect
participation at any stage in the negotiation or determination of prescription
drug pricing ultimately assessed to an insurer's or pharmacy benefit manager's
client health benefit plan.
(12)(17) "Pharmacy benefits plan" or "pharmacy benefits program" means
a plan or program that pays for, reimburses, covers the cost of, or otherwise provides
for pharmacist services to individuals who reside in or are employed in Louisiana.
(18) "Provider" means an individual or entity that furnishes, provides,
dispenses, or administers one or more units of a prescription drug.
(13)(19) "Rebates" means either of the following: all rebates, discounts, and
other price concessions, based on utilization of a prescription drug and paid by the
Page 4 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
manufacturer or other party other than an enrollee, directly or indirectly, to the
pharmacy benefit manager after the claim has been adjudicated at the pharmacy.
Rebates shall include a reasonable estimate, as determined by the commissioner, of
any volume-based discount or other discounts.
(a) Drug manufacturer price concessions including but not limited to
base price concessions, whether described as a rebate or otherwise, and any
price protection rebates and performance-based price concessions that may
accrue directly or indirectly to the pharmacy benefit manager, health insurance
issuer or health plan, or other party on behalf of the health insurance issuer or
health plan, including a pharmacy benefit manager, from a manufacturer,
dispensing pharmacy, or other party in connection with the dispensing or
administration of a prescription drug.
(b) Reasonable estimates of any price concessions, fees, and other
administrative costs that are passed through, or are reasonably anticipated to
be passed through, to the health insurance issuer or health plan and serve to
reduce the health insurance issuer or health plan's liabilities for a prescription
drug.
(20) "Related entity" means either of the following:
(a) Any entity, whether foreign or domestic, that is a member of any
controlled group of corporations, as defined in Section 1563(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code, except that "fifty percent" shall be substituted for "eighty
percent" wherever the latter percentage appears in the code, of which a
pharmacy benefit manager is a member.
(b) Any of the following persons or entities that are treated as a related
entity to the extent provided in rules adopted by the commissioner:
(i) A person other than a corporation that is treated under the rules as
a related entity of a pharmacy benefit manager.
(ii) A person or entity that is treated under the rules as affiliated with a
pharmacy benefit manager in cases where the pharmacy benefit manager is a
person other than a corporation.
Page 5 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
(14)(21) "Specialty drug" means a drug that meets all of the following
criteria:
(a) The drug is used to treat and is prescribed for a person with a complex,
chronic, or rare medical condition that is progressive, can be debilitating or fatal if
left untreated or undertreated, or for which there is no known cure.
(b) The drug is not routinely stocked at a majority of pharmacies within this
state.
(c) The drug has special handling, storage, inventory, or distribution
requirements.
(d) Patients receiving the drug require complex education and treatment
maintenance, such as complex dosing, intensive monitoring, or clinical oversight.
(15)(22) "Spread pricing" means any amount charged or claimed by a
pharmacy benefit manager for a prescription drug that exceeds the amount paid by
the pharmacy benefit manager to the pharmacist or pharmacy for the dispensing of
the prescription drug, minus a pharmacy benefit management fee.
(23) "Net acquisition cost" means the amount paid to acquire a
prescription drug after deducting all rebates, price concessions, fee payments,
and any other payments or economic benefits received directly or indirectly by
the pharmacy benefit manager or any related entity in connection with the
selection, placement, or dispensing of that drug, calculated from the perspective
of the health benefit plan and not the pharmacy benefit manager.
* * *
§1865. Appeals; maximum allowable costs
A.(1) The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide a reasonable
administrative appeal procedure to allow pharmacies to challenge maximum
allowable costs for a specific NDC or NDCs as not meeting the requirements of this
Subpart or being below the cost at which the pharmacy may obtain the NDC. Within
fifteen business days after the applicable fill date, a pharmacy may file an appeal by
following the appeal process as provided for in this Subpart. The pharmacy benefit
manager shall respond to a challenge within fifteen business days after receipt of the
Page 6 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
challenge.
(2) The administrative appeal procedure shall allow a pharmacy or
pharmacist the option to submit a consolidated appeal representing multiple
substantially similar claims.
* * *
G. The commissioner may impose a reasonable fee upon pharmacy benefit
managers, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, in addition to a
license fee and annual report fee, in order to cover the costs of implementation and
enforcement of this Section and R.S. 22:1641 through 1657, 1851 through 1864, and
1961 through 1995 any portion of this Title pertaining to pharmacy benefit
management, including fees to cover the cost of all of the following:
* * *
§1867.1 PBM duty; compensation; audits; contract and other requirements
A. PBM Duty
(1) Any pharmacy benefit manager doing business in this state shall act
solely for the benefit of the health insurance issuers and health plans for which
it provides pharmacy benefit management services and for the enrollees of the
plans.
(2) No pharmacy benefit manager, subsidiary, parent, or affiliate of such
pharmacy benefit manager, either directly or indirectly, shall engage in any
activity which increases the cost of prescription drugs to health insurance
issuers, health plans, or enrollees; restricts or impairs access to prescription
drugs except as directly required by the design of the health plan; or otherwise
interferes with the obligation of the pharmacy benefit manager to act in the best
interest of health insurance issuers, health plans, and enrollees.
(3) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Obtain a rebate, or any other incentive or inducement including but
not limited to discounts, on a name brand drug in exchange for not placing
other name brand drugs, biosimilars, generic drugs, or any other drug in the
same class of drugs on the PBM formulary, unless returned to the health
Page 7 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
insurance issuer or plan sponsor.
(b) Design a prescription drug formulary to favor a certain branded
pharmaceutical or biologic over a therapeutically equivalent generic or
biosimilar, unless the branded pharmaceutical or biologic has a lower net
acquisition cost and that lower cost is reflected in a lower out-of-pocket expense
for consumers or lower premiums for enrollees.
(c) Use its formulary to effectively ban the use of certain pharmacies by
an insured.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, upon a
determination that a pharmacy benefit manager has violated a provision of this
Subsection, the commissioner may impose a fine in the amount of the greater
of the cost to the health insurance issuer, health plan, or enrollees or the
enrichment to the pharmacy benefit manager and any subsidiaries, parent, or
affiliates thereof, plus an additional fine of twenty-five thousand dollars for each
and every act or violation, with no aggregate penalty maximum.
B. PBM Compensation
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager or group purchasing organization may
negotiate but shall not retain rebates and fees. All manufacturer rebates,
whether accrued to a pharmacy benefit manager, a pharmacy benefit manager's
affiliated group purchasing organization, or any other pharmacy benefit
manager owned or affiliated entity shall be passed through to the pharmacy
benefit manager's healthcare plan sponsor client as described in this Section.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager may earn income only from the
following sources:
(a) The assessment of a flat dollar service fee charged on a per-person
per-month or a per-prescription or per-event basis which shall cover all of the
pharmacy benefit manager's administrative, clinical, print, electronic, and
related costs for the provision of prescription benefit management services to
a client health benefit plan. The flat dollar service fee may vary among a
pharmacy benefit manager's clients based on the number of health benefit plan
Page 8 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
participants and clinical and administrative services provided, and shall be set
forth in a written agreement between the parties.
(b) A flat dollar performance bonus payment, which may be paid by a
client health benefit plan to a pharmacy benefit manager for meeting specified
benchmarks in reducing the client health benefit plan's aggregated overall drug
spending over a specific period of time. A flat dollar performance bonus
payment shall be set forth in a written agreement between the parties.
(3) Pharmacy benefit management fees charged by or paid to a
pharmacy benefit manager from a health insurance issuer or health plan shall
not be directly or indirectly based or contingent upon any of the following:
(a) The acquisition cost or any other price metric of a drug.
(b) The amount of savings, rebates, or other fees charged, realized, or
collected by or generated based on the activity of the pharmacy benefit
manager.
(c) The amount of premiums, deductibles, or other cost-sharing or fees
charged, realized, or collected by the pharmacy benefit manager from patients
or other persons on behalf of a patient.
(4)(a) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not earn any income based
directly on prescription drug list prices, acquisition cost, average wholesale cost,
or any other metric for prescription drug pricing or fulfillment at any stage in
the drug supply chain, including but not limited to prescription drug markups,
up-charging, spread pricing of any kind, manufacturer-derived revenues of any
sort, which shall include but not be limited to price protection, group
purchasing organization retained rebates or fees of any kind, rebate aggregator
administrative or any other fees charged or collected, coupon compensation and
patient assistance compensation fees, retained discounts and rebates, and other
manufacturer payments, and any other arrangements on price of prescription
drugs.
(b) Any prohibited pharmacy benefit manager income that a pharmacy
manager may receive during the course of a pharmacy benefit manager's
Page 9 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
operations in service of its Louisiana client health plans shall be considered
prohibited income that the pharmacy benefit manager shall pass through in its
entirety to the pharmacy benefit manager's Louisiana health benefit plan clients
on a quarterly basis.
(5) Annually by December thirty-first, each pharmacy benefit manager
operating in the state shall certify to the commissioner that it has fully and
completely complied with the requirements of this Subsection throughout the
prior calendar year. The certification shall be signed by the chief executive
officer or chief financial officer of the pharmacy benefit manager.
C. PBM Audits
(1) The commissioner and any health insurance issuer or health plan
contracted with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the
commissioner may audit the pharmacy benefit manager once per calendar year.
This audit right is in addition to, and shall not be construed to limit, any other
audit rights authorized by law or contract. The commissioner may also examine
the books or records of any entity in a pharmacy benefit manager's corporate
vertical structure, including but not limited to the insurer, group purchasing
organization, manufacturer, wholesale distributor, special or mail order
pharmacy, retail or long-term care pharmacy, and provider. As part of any
audit, the commissioner, health insurance issuer, or health plan may request
information including but not limited to any of the following:
(a) All reimbursement paid to retail pharmacies, on a claim level, for all
customers of the pharmacy benefit manager in the state, including drug-specific
reimbursement, dispensing fees, all rebates, other fees, ancillary charges,
clawbacks, or adjustments to reimbursement.
(b) Any difference in reimbursement paid to affiliated pharmacies and
unaffiliated pharmacies, including differences in reimbursed ingredient costs
and dispensing fees.
(c) Historical claims data including ingredient cost, quantity, dispensing
fee, sales tax, usual and customary price, channel such as mail or retail, health
Page 10 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
insurance issuer or health plan paid amount, days' supply, the amount paid by
the covered individual, formulary tier, acquisition cost, and any administrative
fee associated with the claim, as applicable.
(d) Aggregate rebate amounts received directly or indirectly from
manufacturers, including from any other entity affiliated with or related to the
pharmacy benefit manager that negotiates or contracts with manufacturers,
such as group purchasing organizations and rebate aggregators, by calendar
quarter.
(2) The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide information pursuant
to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection no later than thirty days after its receipt of
any request from the commissioner, health insurance issuer, or health plan.
(3) The commissioner may dictate the form in which the pharmacy
benefit manager will provide information in response to an audit pursuant to
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(4) The pharmacy benefit manager shall certify that all information
submitted to the commissioner or any health insurance issuer or health plan in
accordance with this Subsection is accurate and complete in all material
respects. The certification shall be signed by the chief executive officer or chief
financial officer of the pharmacy benefit manager.
(5)(a) The commissioner and any health insurance issuer or health plan
contracted with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the
commissioner shall not directly or indirectly publish or otherwise disclose any
confidential, proprietary information, including but not limited to any
information that would reveal the identity of a specific health plan or
manufacturer, the price charged for a specific drug or class of drugs, the
amount of any rebates provided for a specific drug or class of drugs, or that
would otherwise have the potential to compromise the financial, competitive, or
proprietary nature of the information. Any such information shall be protected
as confidential and proprietary information, and is not a public record and is
exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:4.1 et seq.
Page 11 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
The commissioner and any health insurance issuer or health plan contracted
with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the commissioner
shall impose the confidentiality protections and requirements of this Paragraph
on any agent or downstream third party that may receive or have access to this
information.
(b) Nothing in this Paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the
commissioner from disclosing information to a Prescription Drug Affordability
Board established pursuant to this Title if such information is subject to the
confidentiality protections applicable to that board.
D. PBM Contract and Other Requirements
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager contract with a health insurance issuer
or health plan entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after January
1, 2027, shall do both of the following:
(a) Specify all forms of revenue, including pharmacy benefit
management fees, to be paid by the health insurance issuer or health plan to the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(b) Acknowledge that spread pricing is not permitted in accordance with
R.S. 22:1867.
E.(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, a violation of
this Section shall be punishable by the commissioner through a civil monetary
penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars for each and every act or violation, with
no aggregate penalty maximum.
(2) If a violation for which the commissioner has imposed a fine in
accordance with this Subsection is not corrected within thirty days after notice
of the violation is received by the pharmacy benefit manager, the commissioner
shall suspend or revoke the pharmacy benefit manager's license in accordance
with R.S. 49:977.3.
F. In implementing the requirements of this Section, the state shall
regulate a pharmacy benefit manager or health insurance issuer only to the
extent permissible under applicable law.
Page 12 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
G. The provisions of this Subpart shall apply only to the extent not
preempted or otherwise prohibited by federal law. To the extent such conflict
exists, the validity of the remainder of this Subpart and the applicability thereof
to any other entity, person, or circumstance shall not be affected.
H. Pharmacy Technology and Third Party Data Sharing
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager, or any affiliate, subsidiary, or agent of
a pharmacy benefit manager, shall not directly or indirectly prohibit or restrict
a pharmacist or pharmacy from offering, directly or through a third party,
services or products to increase transparency, access, and affordability of
prescription drugs for patients. Such services and products include but are not
limited to:
(a) Simplified payment processes, electronic payments, or payment
plans.
(b) Adherence support services or communications.
(c) Information regarding patient out-of-pocket costs or alternative
medication options.
(d) Electronic transactions that allow the pharmacist or pharmacy to
provide patients with price and benefits transparency.
(e) Sharing claims data or other healthcare transaction data of patients
with the patient, the patient's healthcare providers, a business associate as that
term is defined in 45 CFR 160.103, or any third party authorized by the patient
at the time the pharmacist or pharmacy runs the claim or other electronic
transaction or at any time thereafter.
(f) Electronic transactions that allow the pharmacist or pharmacy to
provide patients with prior authorization support to enable access to the
patient's prescription drug.
(g) Any lawful copayment assistance or other out-of-pocket support to
patients to lower the costs of their prescription drugs.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager, or any affiliate, subsidiary, or agent of
a pharmacy benefit manager, shall not directly or indirectly:
Page 13 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
(a) Audit, investigate, terminate, or threaten to terminate a pharmacist
or pharmacy from the pharmacy benefit manager's network as a result of the
pharmacist or pharmacy engaging in any activity described in or allowed by
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(b) Reduce, rescind, or otherwise claw back any reimbursement payment
in whole or in part to a pharmacist or pharmacy for a prescriptions drug's
ingredient cost or dispensing fee as a result of the pharmacist or pharmacy
engaging in any activity described in or allowed by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection.
(c) Discriminate against or otherwise penalize a pharmacist or
pharmacy, including but not limited to decreasing any reimbursement rates or
by reclassifying the pharmacist or pharmacy's class of trade as a result of the
pharmacist or pharmacy engaging in any activity described in or allowed by
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to modify or limit the
application of R.S. 40:2870(A)(3) to a pharmacy benefit manager's handling of
beneficiary personal health care or contact information. A pharmacy's sharing
of claims data or other healthcare transaction data with a business associate, as
that term is defined in 45 CFR 160.103, in compliance with the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and its implementing
regulations, shall not constitute a pharmacy benefit manager buying, selling,
transferring, or providing personal health care or contact information within
the meaning of R.S. 40:2870(A)(3).
(4) Any contract provision between a pharmacy benefit manager and a
pharmacist or pharmacy that conflicts with this Subsection shall be severable
from the contract and considered void and unenforceable in this state.
(5) A violation of this Subsection is subject to the penalties provided in
this Section.
* * *
§1868.2. Pharmacy benefit manager formularies
Page 14 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Affiliated manufacturer" means a drug or biological product
manufacturer that, either directly or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, meets one or more of the following criteria:
(a) Has an investment or ownership interest greater than five percent in
a pharmacy benefit manager.
(b) Shares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager.
(c) Has an investor or a holder of an ownership interest in a pharmacy
benefit manager.
(2) "Biological product" has the same meaning as in the Public Health
Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 262.
(3) "Biosimilar" has the same meaning as in the Public Health Service
Act, 42 U.S.C. 262.
(4) "Interchangeable" has the same meaning as in the Public Health
Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 262.
B.(1) A pharmacy benefit manager revising the formulary of covered
prescription drugs at the beginning of a plan year shall provide a sixty-day
continuity-of-care period in which the covered prescription drug that is being
revised from the formulary continues to be provided in the same formulary tier
and cost-sharing structure for the period of sixty days.
(2) The sixty-day continuity-of-care period commences upon notification
to the insured by the insurer.
(3) This Subsection does not apply if any of the following have occurred
regarding the covered prescription drug:
(a) The prescription drug has been made available over the counter by
the United States Food and Drug Administration and has entered the
commercial market as such.
(b) The prescription drug has been removed or withdrawn from the
commercial market by the manufacturer.
Page 15 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
(c) The prescription drug is subject to an involuntary recall by state or
federal authorities and is no longer available on the commercial market.
C. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require an insured to receive
a drug or biological product that is manufactured by an affiliated manufacturer
when there is an available generically equivalent drug, or an available biological
product that is biosimilar to and interchangeable for the prescribed biological
product.
D. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require an insured to receive
a more expensive name brand drug when less expensive name brand drugs,
biosimilars, generic drugs, or any other drug in the same class of drugs are
available.
E. Other than at the time of coverage renewal, while an insured is taking
a prescription drug a pharmacy benefit manager shall not do any of the
following:
(1) Remove the prescription drug from its list of covered drugs during
the policy year unless any of the following have occurred:
(a) The United States Food and Drug Administration has issued a
statement about the drug which calls into question the clinical safety of the
drug.
(b) The manufacturer of the drug has notified the United States Food
and Drug Administration of a manufacturing discontinuance or potential
discontinuance of the drug as required by the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 356c.
(c) The drug has been approved and made available over the counter by
the United States Food and Drug Administration and entered the commercial
market as such.
(2) Reclassify the drug to a more restrictive drug tier or increase the
amount that an insured must pay for a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible
for prescription drug benefits, or reclassify the drug to a higher cost-sharing
tier during the policy year.
Page 16 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
F. This Section does not prohibit the addition of prescription drugs to the
formulary during the policy year.
G. The provisions of this Subpart shall apply only to the extent not
preempted or otherwise prohibited by federal law. To the extent such conflict
exists, the validity of the remainder of this Subpart and the applicability thereof
to any other entity, person, or circumstance shall not be affected.
Section 2. R.S. 39:1600.1(A), the introductory paragraph of 1600.1(D), and
1600.1(D)(6) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1600.1. Procurement of pharmacy benefit manager services by reverse auction
A.(1) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana
Competitive Pharmacy Benefit Managers Act".
(2) It is recommended to conduct the initial PBM reverse auction no later
than July 1, 2028. Terms of any contract for pharmacy benefit services awarded
through the initial reverse auction process may become effective at
commencement of the new plan year beginning January 1, 2029.
(3) It is recommended that PBM reverse auctions be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter at a frequency of no less than
once every five years.
* * *
D. Contracts It is recommended that contracts for pharmacy benefit
manager services obtained through reverse auction shall comply with the following:
* * *
(6)(a) With technical assistance and support provided by the technology
platform provider, the division of administration shall specify the terms of the
participant bidding agreement which shall not be modified except by specific consent
of the division of administration.
(b) It is recommended that the participant bidding agreement require
qualified bidders in the PBM reverse auction process, both full service PBMs
and carve-out service providers, to comply with the terms and provisions of all
PBM regulations in Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Page 17 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
(c) It is recommended that qualified specialty carve-out prescription
drug service providers compete with full service PBMs on the basis of price and
any other appropriate criteria for award of a specialty drug contract over
multiple rounds of dynamically competitive reverse auction bidding.
(d) It is recommended that qualified generic carve-out prescription drug
service providers compete with full service PBMs on the basis of price and any
other appropriate criteria for award of a generic drug contract over multiple
rounds of dynamically competitive reverse auction bidding.
(e) The PBM reverse auction process may result in award of multiple or
hybrid contracts to full service and carve-out prescription service providers if
such award is determined to be of higher value to the state.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(11) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(11) R.S. 22:2, 14, 31, 42.1, 88, 244, 263, 265, 461, 550.7, 550.22, 550.29,
550.30, 571, 572, 572.1, 572.2, 574, 601.3, 618, 639, 691.4, 691.5, 691.6, 691.7,
691.8, 691.9, 691.9.1, 691.10, 691.38, 691.56, 732, 752, 753, 771, 834, 972(D), 976,
1008, 1019.2, 1203, 1460, 1464, 1466, 1483.1, 1488, 1546, 1559, 1566(D), 1644,
1656, 1657.1, 1660.7, 1723, 1796, 1801, 1808.3, 1867.1, 1869, 1927, 1929, 1983,
1984, 2036, 2045, 2056, 2085, 2091, 2293, 2303, 2508
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 22:1868.1 and Section 5 of Act 474 of the 2025 Regular Session are
hereby repealed in their entirety.
Page 18 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 387 ENROLLED
Section 5. Sections 1 through 4 and 6 through 8 of this Act shall take effect and
become enforceable only if Section 4 of the Act which originated as Senate Bill No. 401 of
the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted and becomes effective.
Section 6. The provisions of this Act amending and reenacting R.S. 22:1856.1 and
1865 and enacting 1867.1(C) and 1867.1(E) and (F), shall become effective upon signature
of the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to
become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, these provisions of this Act shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
Section 7. The provisions of this Act amending and reenacting R.S. 22:1863 and
enacting 1867.1(A)(1), (2), and (4) and (D) shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Section 8. The provisions of this Act amending and reenacting R.S. 39:1600.1(A) and
the introductory paragraph of 1600.1(D) and 1600.1(D)(6) and enacting 1867.1(A)(3) and
(B) and 1868.2 shall become effective on January 1, 2028.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 19 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.